Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 662, as


amended by Section 193, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 662), is amended to read as follows:


Section 662. Any person guilty of fighting any duel with a


deadly weapon, although no death or wound ensues, shall be guilty of


a Class C1 felony offense punishable by imprisonment as provided for


in subsections B through E of Section 20L of this title.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 663 of Title 21, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means any


harm that creates a substantial risk of death or that causes death,

Req. No. 3202 Page 1


serious permanent disfigurement, protracted loss or impairment of


the function of any bodily member or organ, or prolonged impairment


of the function of any bodily member or organ.


B. The victim’s effective consent or the actor’s reasonable


belief that the victim consented to the actor’s conduct is an


affirmative defense to prosecution under Sections 644 and 647 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes if:


1. The conduct did not threaten or inflict serious bodily


injury; and


2. The victim knew the conduct was a risk of:


a. his or her occupation,


b. recognized medical treatment, or


c. a scientific experiment conducted by recognized


methods.


C. The defense to prosecution provided by subsection B of this


section shall not be available to a defendant who commits an offense


described by subsection B of this section as a condition of the


defendant’s or the victim’s initiation or continued membership in a


criminal street gang, as defined in subsection F of Section 856 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3202 BRC 1/14/2026 10:16:34 PM



Req. No. 3202 Page 2